gd_GB/gd_GB.dic
Aimeireaganaich/EHKN
Aintìogacha/EHKN
Anguilliach/EHKNT
Anguillich/EHKN
Artaraich/EHKN
Asarbaideànacha/EHKN
Chanadachaibh/K
Eadraidhean/EHKN
Eartracha/EHKN
Eilein/EHKN
Fhearghastanach/EK
Fhrìoslannach/EK
Féinneibh/EK
Iapanachaibh/EHKN
Iortaich/EHKN
Itiopach/EHKNT
Mharcais/K
Oilimpeadaibh/EHKN
Oirthireachaibh/EHKN
Omànach/EHKNT
Samothachaibh/KT
Shalm/KT
Sheonstanach/KT
Shiridheachaibh/KT
Shàimbitheacha/KT
Somàilitheachaibh/KT
Sìombabuthaich/KT
Ucràinich/EHKN
Ungaireachaibh/EHKN
abachadh/EHKNT
abaicheid/EHKN
abairtibh/EHKN
abhainn/EHKN
abhsadh/EHKNT
ablacha/EHKN
abuichead/EHKN
acadamaidh/EHKN
acaidean/EHKN
acainn/EHKN
acarsaidean/EHKN
achdan/EHKN
achlasanaibh/EHKN
acrach/EHKN
adan/EHKN
adharcaibh/EHKN
adhartachaidhean/EHKN
adhbrannan/EHKN
adhraicean/EHKN
aeriail/EHKN
aerialan/EHKN
agallamh/EHKNT
agar/EHKN
aghannan/EHKN
aghastaran/EHKN
agusain/EHKN
aichille/EHKN
aidmheileachdaibh/EHKN
aifhrinn/EHKNT
ailbheanan/EHKN
ailisibh/EHKN
aille/EHKN
ailleig/EHKN
aimheal/EHKNT
aimlisge/EHKN
ain-deòin/EHKN
ain-mèin/EHKN
aineolach/EHKNT
ainfhiachaibh/EHKN
ainis/EHKN
ainlean/EHKN
ainmeachas/EHKNT
ainmhidhibh/EHKN
ainmichean/EHKN
aintheasa/EHKN
airgeadais/EHKN
airidheachd/EHKN
aisc/EHKN
aiseal/EHKNT
aisein/EHKN
aislig/EHKN
aisridhibh/EHKN
aiteas/EHKNT
aithghearrachdaibh/EHKN
aithnichearan/EHKN
aithrisean/EHKN
albatrais/EHKN
allamharach/EHKN
allmharachaibh/EHKN
alp/EHKNT
altramas/EHKNT
am-meidheadair/EHKN
amaiteir/EHKN
amfora/EHKNT
amforaibh/EHKN
amhsopragaibh/EHKN
an-eirmseachdan/EHKN
an-uaire/EHKN
ana-cleachdadh/EHKNT
ana-cothroim/EHKN
anabarra/EHKN
anabas/EHKNT
anailean/EHKN
anarcaiche/EHKNT
annlan/EHKNT
aobranna/EHKN
aodachaibh/EHKN
aoga/EHKN
aoigheachd/EHKN
aoinneoine/EHKN
aomaidh/EHKN
aona-rèilean/EHKN
aonaich/EHKN
aonranachd/EHKN
aontaidh/EHKN
aparanan/EHKN
arain-chruithneachd/EHKN
arainne/EHKN
aran-cridhe/EHKNT
arm-lanna/EHKN
arpaig/EHKN
arpaige/EHKN
asbhuain/EHKN
aslachaidh/EHKN
astasaibh/EHKN
atal/EHKNT
ath-bhreithean/EHKN
ath-bhreithneachaidh/EHKN
ath-dhùblachaidhean/EHKN
ath-ghnàthachaidh/EHKN
ath-ionnsachaidh/EHKN
ath-riochdachaidhean/EHKN
ath-sgrìobhadh/EHKNT
ath-sgrùdaidhean/EHKN
ath-shlànachaidh/EHKN
ath-òrdachaidhean/EHKN
athair-chéile/EHKN
athaisich/EHKN
baltachaidhean/K
beanaige/K
bhaltachadh/K
bhean-siubhla/K
bhlabhdaireibh/K
bhonnaich-ghrùthain/K
bhrogach/K
bhuic/K
bhàrdachdaibh/K
binneasan/K
boillsge/K
briathrachas/K
buaireas/K
bàighe/K
cabastairean/K
canntailibh/K
ceadan-siubhail/K
chabair/K
chanaich/K
chathaig/K
cheàrnaidhean/K
chlaon-ruatharan/K
chlèith/K
cho-chomhairlibh/K
choilidhean/K
chomhardaidh/K
chraobhagan/K
chruain/K
chudtrom/K
chuthach/K
chòmhstrithean/K
ciùbaide/K
closaich/K
cnuic/K
co-structar/K
colonaidh/K
cot/K
croisibh/K
cuairt-dhurraige/K
cunntas/K
còigimh/K
daoid/K
deudaich/K
dhearmad/K
dhiùmhlachaibh/K
dhriùchd/K
dhà-dheug-shliosnach/K
dhòirneagan/K
dochuinn/K
druimneanaibh/K
dèiseige/K
dùmhladais/K
each-cogaidh/EHKNT
eacha/EHKN
eaconomachdaibh/EHKN
eadar-mheadhanairibh/EHKN
eadar-sgaoileadhaibh/EHKN
eadaramhaibh/EHKN
eagal/EHKNT
eagrachaidhean/EHKN
ealaidhean/EHKN
ealdhain/EHKN
ealtuinnibh/EHKN
eanracais/EHKN
earalais/EHKN
earbard/EHKNT
earr-ghlòire/EHKN
earraideas/EHKNT
earranta/H
easach/EHKNT
easaontaraibh/EHKN
easgairibh/EHKN
easponantan/EHKN
easpuigeachd/EHKN
eidheantaich/EHKN
eidhne/EHKN
eigheantach/EHKN
eilitrioman/EHKN
einnseanair/EHKNT
eintiteasan/EHKN
eisgeachd/EHKN
eisimeilean/EHKN
eucoirean/EHKN
eucorach/EHKNT
eughach/EHKN
eunan/EHKNT
eàrr-sgrìobhadh/EHKN
eàrr-sgrìobhaidhean/EHKN
fadhail/EK
faircheibh/EK
faiteibh/EK
famhaibh/EK
faosaid/EK
feadaig/EK
feobhais/EK
feur/EK
feòsaige/EK
fhailbheachain/EK
fhalaisgeadh/EK
fhaoighteach/EK
fhaoinsgeoil/EK
fharspag/EK
fheansair/EK
fheurstainean/EK
fhianach/EK
fhiathachaidhean/EK
fhineachasan/EK
fhiùisein/EK
fhlùranachd/EK
fhoighidinn/EK
fhoinneannan/EK
fhorman/EK
fhreastal/EK
fhroiligean/EK
fhuids/EK
fhuirbhidh/EK
fhàil/EK
fhàrlusan/EK
fhèin-ùghdarrasan/EK
fhéithleig/EK
fhìnealtasaibh/EK
fhòire/EK
fianaisich/EK
fiodhanaibh/EK
flaith/EK
fleasgaibh/EK
fo-dhuilleagaibh/EK
foillseachan/EK
fosglaidhean/EK
freumhaig/EK
frith-ionnsaighe/EK
fuagradh/EK
fuinill/EK
fàiltean/EK
fàsgaidh/EK
fèichnear/EK
féich/EK
fìnid/EK
fón-làimhe/EK
gaisidh/K
geòtanan/K
ghearra/K
ghoirteige/K
ginneabhagan/K
griùilleas/K
iar-chathraichean/EHKN
iar-cheumnaichean/EHKN
iarrainnean/EHKN
iarrtais/EHKN
iarsmaidh/EHKN
idheonachaidh/EHKN
ighean/EHKN
imlich/EHKN
imreachaidh/EHKN
in-ghabhalaichean/EHKN
ingharaibh/EHKN
inisgeadh/EHKNT
innean/EHKNT
inneil-chogaidh/EHKN
innleachdaibh/EHKN
innlichean/EHKN
inntinneach/H
iogairt/EHKN
iolaire/EHKN
ioma-nòmaiche/EHKNT
ioma-thaobhachasaibh/EHKN
ioma-thaobhachasan/EHKN
iomallaichean/EHKN
iomamaichean/EHKN
iomrallachd/EHKN
iomrallachdan/EHKN
iomruinichea/EHKN
ionad-thaighean/EHKNT
ionadaibh/EHKN
ionaid/EHKN
iongnaidhean/EHKN
ionnracais/EHKN
ionnsaigh/EHKN
ionracan/EHKNT
isbean/EHKNT
itealag/EHKN
iuthairn/EHKN
iùbharan/EHKN
iùlaibh/EHKN
leas-chunnraidh/K
luathas/K
mandoilinichean/K
mhaoiniche/K
mhodailibh/K
mhórain/K
màidsear/K
nìonagan/K
obrachadh/EHKNT
ochasaibh/EHKN
ofrailean/EHKN
ogsaidibh/EHKN
oibseact/EHKNT
oifigeir/EHKN
oighre/EHKNT
oighreagaibh/EHKN
oir-loidhnichear/EHKNT
oirean/EHKN
oiribh/EHKN
olcaibh/EHKN
onaire/EHKN
orra/EHKN
os-bhoileach/H
os-eagrachasan/EHKN
ostaile/EHKN
othaig/EHKNT
phaiseanan/K
phrabaig/K
plangaide/K
pèard/K
ruadhag/K
sabotais/KT
saighdearaibh-coise/KT
salaichearan/KT
samhlaidhean/KT
saodachadh/KT
saoranach/KT
seacail/KT
seachadais/KT
seachdamh/KST
seachranaibh/KT
sealgairibh/KT
seanairibh/KT
seansa/KT
searragan/KT
seicealair/KT
seilg/KT
seisrich/KT
seusair/KT
seòltachdaibh/KT
sgairt/KT
sgaradairean/KT
sgeap/KT
sgeulachdaibh/KT
sgillinge/KT
sgiollaidh/KT
sgiorramaibh/KT
sglèadair/KT
sgollaig/KT
sgramagan/KT
sgriobtair/KT
sgrìb/KT
sgrùdaicheibh/KT
sgurran/KT
sgéil/KT
sgùdan/KT
shaidealaibh/KT
shailleadh/KT
shamhaibh/KT
shamplaibh/KT
shaoirsinneachdaibh/KT
shaothraichean/KT
sheachd-shliosnaich/KT
sheachdaine/KT
sheaiplin/KT
shean-bhean/KT
sheangana/KT
shearbhachd/KT
sheasgad/KT
sheipinn/KT
sheòbhraig/KT
shiathaimh/KT
shiocamoran/KT
shiubhalaibh/KT
shlabhaig/KT
shlaoid/KT
shliosaibh/KT
shlòcain/KT
shnàs/KT
shoillseanaibh/KT
shradagaibh/KT
shràcaibh/KT
shubsadaidhean/KT
shuipear/KT
shuthagaibh/KT
shèimheachadh/KT
shìobhaltais/KT
shòbhragan/KT
shùileachaidhean/KT
siathamh/KST
sileig/KT
siondacaite/KT
siùine/KT
slaiseadh/KT
sleaghadair/KT
sloinntearachd/KT
smaoineis/KT
smàdaidh/KT
snidhean/KT
socaide/KT
somaltanaibh/KT
spealadairean/KT
speisealachdaibh/KT
spiris/KT
spruis/KT
spéirdibh/KT
sreamaidh/KT
sròn/KT
stalc/KT
steallaige/KT
stiùirichean/KT
stoirmean-sneachda/KT
struthlagan/KT
stàid/KT
stéisean-triantanachaidh/KT
suanaichean/KT
sunaise/KT
sàr/ST
sèamaraibh/KT
sìnteagan/KT
sìtheanaich/KT
sònarach/KT
sùigheir/KT
teaghlachasaibh/K
tharr-pheing/K
thorta/K
thàidhibh/K
tort/K
tàilleaibh/K
uaill/EHKN
uaimibh/EHKN
uaireadair/EHKNT
uamhasaibh/EHKN
uasail/EHKN
udalain/EHKN
ughagana/EHKN
uibhireacha/EHKN
uile-amasach/H
uilleagan/EHKNT
uinnlean/EHKN
uireasbhaich/EHKN
uirgheallaibh/EHKN
uisgeachan/EHKN
ullaichearaibh/EHKN
ungaibh/EHKN
urchallan/EHKN
urlataich/EHKN
urraman/EHKN
ursa/EHKNT
Àrd-chuip/EHKN
Èisdealach/EHKN
Ùigeach/EHKNT
àbanaibh/EHKN
àbhaibh/EHKN
àilgheas/EHKNT
àilleagain/EHKN
àireamhachaidhean/EHKN
àiridhibh/EHKN
àirleas/EHKNT
àirne/EHKN
àitibh/EHKN
àitichean-coinneachaidh/EHKN
àraidh/EHKN
àrainn/EHKN
àrann/EHKN
àrd-ealaine/EHKN
àrd-easbuigeachdaibh/EHKN
àrd-sagartan/EHKN
àrd-tagraiche/EHKNT
àrd-tìribh/EHKN
àrsaidh/H
às-dùnaidhean/EHKN
ás-mhalairteir/EHKN
èasgainn/EHKN
èibhleag/EHKN
èifeachdais/EHKN
èildearaibh/EHKN
èisg-linne/EHKN
éideachaidh/EHKN
éifeachdan/EHKN
éighean/EHKN
éileadh/EHKNT
éisdeachdan/EHKN
éiteagaibh/EHKN
ìoc-shlaint/EHKN
ìoc-èirige/EHKN
ìochdaibh/EHKN
ìoranas/EHKNT
ìoslachadh/EHKNT
òglacha/EHKN
òigearaibh/EHKN
òigearan/EHKN
òraidicheibh/EHKN
òranaibh/EHKN
òtraich/EHKN
òtraichibh/EHKN
óthasg/EHKN
ùilleach/H
ùillidh/EHKNT
ùmladh/EHKNT
ùmlaighean/EHKN
ùr-chleasaiche/EHKNT
ùr-ghnàthachaidh/EHKN
ùrnaigh/EHKN
ùthanaibh/EHKN
